Illinois, session 104th, HB2913.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Data 5Broker Registration and Accessible Deletion Mechanism Act. 6    Section 5. Definition. As used in this Act, "data broker" 7means a business that knowingly collects and sells or licenses 8to third parties the brokered personal information of an 9individual with whom the business does not have a direct 10relationship. "Data broker" does not include a business that 11conducts the following activities and the collection, sale, or 12licensing of brokered personal information incidental to 13conducting the activities:14        (1) developing or maintaining third-party e-commerce 15    or application platforms;16        (2) providing 411 directory assistance or directory 17    information services, including name, address, and 18    telephone number, on behalf of or as a function of a 19    telecommunications carrier;20        (3) collecting or transmitting information to be 21    submitted to a State or federal agency for the purpose of 22    performing a lawful check of criminal history record 23    information using fingerprints or receiving the results of   HB2913- 2 -LRB104 10750 SPS 20829 b1    that check;2        (4) collecting, maintaining, disclosing, selling, 3    communicating, or using any personal information bearing 4    on a consumer's credit worthiness, credit standing, credit 5    capacity, character, general reputation, personal 6    characteristics, or mode of living by a consumer reporting 7    agency, furnisher, or user that provides information for 8    use in a consumer report, and by a user of a consumer 9    report, but only to the extent that the activity is 10    regulated by and authorized under the Fair Credit 11    Reporting Act, 15 U.S.C. 1681 et seq. 12    Section 10. Annual registration.13    (a) Annually, on or before January 31, a data broker 14operating in this State shall register with the Attorney 15General.16    (b) In registering with the Attorney General, a data 17broker shall pay a registration fee in an amount determined by 18the Attorney General, not to exceed the reasonable costs of 19establishing and maintaining the informational website 20described in Section 60. A data broker shall also provide the 21following information:22        (1) the name of the data broker and its primary 23    physical, email, and website addresses;24        (2) whether the data broker collects the personal 25    information of minors;  HB2913- 3 -LRB104 10750 SPS 20829 b1        (3) whether the data broker collects consumers' 2    precise geolocation;3        (4) whether the data broker collects consumers' 4    reproductive health care data;5        (5) a link to a page on the data broker's website that 6    does not make use of any dark patterns;7        (6) whether, and to what extent, the data broker or 8    any of its subsidiaries is regulated by any of the 9    following: 10            (A) the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 11        U.S.C. 1681 et seq.); and12            (B) the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act (Public Law 13        106-102) and its implementing regulations; and14        (7) any additional information or explanation the data 15    broker chooses to provide concerning its data collection 16    practices.17    (d) The Attorney General shall create a page on its 18website where the registration information provided in 19subsection (c) shall be made accessible to the public.20    (e) A data broker that fails to register as required by 21this Section shall be liable for civil penalties and costs in 22an action brought by the Attorney General as follows:23        (1) a civil penalty of $200 for each day the data 24    broker fails to register as required by this Section;25        (2) an amount equal to the fees that were due during 26    the period it failed to register; and  HB2913- 4 -LRB104 10750 SPS 20829 b1        (3) expenses incurred by the Attorney General in the 2    investigation and administration of the action as the 3    court deems appropriate.4    (f) All moneys received by the Attorney General under this 5Section shall be deposited into the Data Broker Registry Fund, 6a special fund created in the State treasury, and shall be used 7to administer and enforce this Act. 8    Section 15. Accessible deletion mechanism.9    (a) No later than January 1, 2027, the Attorney General 10shall establish an accessible deletion mechanism that does the 11following:12        (1) implements and maintains reasonable security 13    procedures and practices, including, but not limited to, 14    administrative, physical, and technical safeguards 15    appropriate to the nature of the information and the 16    purposes for which the personal information will be used 17    and to protect consumers' personal information from 18    unauthorized use, disclosure, access, destruction, or 19    modification;20        (2) allows a consumer, through a single verifiable 21    consumer request, to request that every data broker that 22    maintains any personal information delete any personal 23    information related to that consumer held by the data 24    broker or associated service provider or contractor;25        (3) allows a consumer to selectively exclude specific   HB2913- 5 -LRB104 10750 SPS 20829 b1    data brokers from a request made under paragraph (2); and2        (4) allows a consumer to make a request to alter a 3    previous request made under this subsection after at least 4    45 days have passed since the consumer last made a request 5    under this Section.6    (b) The accessible deletion mechanism established under 7subsection (a) shall meet the following requirements:8        (1) allow a consumer to request the deletion of all 9    personal information related to that consumer through a 10    single deletion request;11        (2) permit a consumer to securely submit information 12    in one or more privacy-protecting ways determined by the 13    Attorney General to aid in the deletion request;14        (3) allow data brokers registered with the Attorney 15    General to determine whether an individual has submitted a 16    verifiable consumer request to delete the personal 17    information related to that consumer as described in 18    paragraph (1) and shall not allow the disclosure of any 19    additional personal information when the data broker 20    accesses the accessible deletion mechanism unless 21    otherwise specified in this Act;22        (4) allow a consumer to make a request described in 23    paragraph (1) using an Internet service operated by the 24    Attorney General;25        (5) be accessible free of charge for a consumer to 26    make a request described in paragraph (1);  HB2913- 6 -LRB104 10750 SPS 20829 b1        (6) allow a consumer to make a request described in 2    paragraph (1) in any language spoken by any consumer for 3    whom personal information has been collected by data 4    brokers;5        (7) be readily accessible and usable by consumers with 6    disabilities;7        (8) support the ability of a consumer's authorized 8    agents to aid in the deletion request;9        (9) allow the consumer, or their authorized agent, to 10    verify the status of the consumer's deletion request; and11        (10) provide a description of the following: 12            (A) the deletion permitted by this Section; 13            (B) the process for submitting a deletion request 14        under this Section; and15            (C) examples of the types of information that may 16        be deleted.17    (c) Beginning on August 1, 2027, a data broker shall 18access the accessible deletion mechanism established under 19subsection (a) at least once every 45 days and do the 20following:21        (1) within 45 days after receiving a request made 22    under this Section, process all deletion requests made 23    under this Section and delete all personal information 24    related to the consumers making the requests consistent 25    with the requirements of this Section;26        (2) in cases where a data broker denies a consumer   HB2913- 7 -LRB104 10750 SPS 20829 b1    request to delete under this title because the request 2    cannot be verified, process the request as an opt-out of 3    the sale or sharing of the consumer's personal 4    information;5        (3) direct all service providers or contractors 6    associated with the data broker to delete all personal 7    information in their possession related to the consumers 8    making the requests described in paragraph (1); and9        (4) direct all service providers or contractors 10    associated with the data broker to process a request 11    described by paragraph (2) as an opt-out of the sale or 12    sharing of the consumer's personal information.13    (d) Beginning on August 1, 2027, after a consumer has 14submitted a deletion request and a data broker has deleted the 15consumer's data as described in subsection (c), the data 16broker shall delete all personal information of the consumer 17at least once every 45 days unless the consumer requests 18otherwise or the deletion is not required.19    (e) Beginning on August 1, 2027, after a consumer has 20submitted a deletion request and a data broker has deleted the 21consumer's data as described in subsection (c), the data 22broker shall not sell or share new personal information of the 23consumer unless the consumer requests otherwise or selling or 24sharing the personal information is permitted.25    (e) Beginning on January 1, 2029, and every 3 years 26thereafter, a data broker shall undergo an audit by an   HB2913- 8 -LRB104 10750 SPS 20829 b1independent third party to determine compliance with this 2Section. The data broker shall submit a report resulting from 3the audit and any related materials to the Attorney General 4within 5 business days after receiving a written request from 5the Attorney General. A data broker shall maintain the report 6resulting from the audit for at least 6 years.7    (f) The Attorney General may charge an access fee to a data 8broker when the data broker accesses the accessible deletion 9mechanism that does not exceed the reasonable costs of 10providing that access to the accessible deletion mechanism. 11    Section 20. Enforcement. A violation of Section 15 of this 12Act constitutes an unlawful practice under the Consumer Fraud 13and Deceptive Business Practices Act. All remedies, penalties, 14and authority granted to the Attorney General by the Consumer 15Fraud and Deceptive Business Practices Act shall be available 16to him or her for the enforcement of this Act. 17    Section 25. Enforcement. The Attorney General may adopt 18rules to implement and administer this Act. 19    Section 90. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 20Section 5.1030 as follows: 21    (30 ILCS 105/5.1030 new)22    Sec. 5.1030. The Data Broker Registry Fund.   HB2913- 9 -LRB104 10750 SPS 20829 b1    Section 95. The Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 2Practices Act is amended by adding Section 2HHHH as follows: 3    (815 ILCS 505/2HHHH new)4    Sec. 2HHHH. Violations of the Data Broker Registration and 5Accessible Deletion Mechanism Act. A person who violates 6Section 15 of the Data Broker Registration and Accessible 7Deletion Mechanism Act commits an unlawful practice within the 8meaning of this Act.